Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-528
Reports; filing requirements; contents.

(1)(a) On or before October 15 in all school districts, the superintendent shall file with the State Department of Education a report showing the number of children from five through eighteen years of age belonging to the school district according to the census taken as provided in sections 79-524 and 79-578.

(b) The board of any district neglecting to take and report the enumeration shall be liable to the school district for all school money which such district may lose by such neglect.

(2) On or before June 30 the superintendent of each school district shall file with the Commissioner of Education a report described as an end-of-the-school-year annual statistical summary showing (a) the number of children attending school during the year under five years of age, (b) the length of time the school has been taught during the year by a qualified teacher, (c) the length of time taught by each substitute teacher, (d) information regarding option enrollment applications as required under subdivision (3)(a) of section 79-239, and (e) such other information as the Commissioner of Education directs.

(3) On or before November 1 the superintendent of each school district shall submit to the Commissioner of Education a report described as the annual financial report showing (a) the amount of money received from all sources during the year and the amount of money expended by the school district during the year, (b) the amount of bonded indebtedness, (c) such other information as shall be necessary to fulfill the requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and section 79-1114, and (d) such other information as the Commissioner of Education directs.

(4)(a) On or before October 15 of each year, the superintendent of each school district shall file with the commissioner the fall school district membership report, which report shall include the number of children from birth through twenty years of age enrolled in the district on October 1 of a given school year. The report shall enumerate (i) students by grade level, (ii) school district levies and total assessed valuation for the current fiscal year, (iii) students enrolled in the district as option students, resident students enrolled in another district as option students, students enrolled in the district as open enrollment students, and resident students enrolled in another district as open enrollment students, and (iv) such other information as the Commissioner of Education directs.

(b) When any school district fails to submit its fall membership report by November 1, the commissioner shall, after notice to the district and an opportunity to be heard, direct that any state aid granted pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act be withheld until such time as the report is received by the department. In addition, the commissioner shall direct the county treasurer to withhold all school money belonging to the school district until such time as the commissioner notifies the county treasurer of receipt of such report. The county treasurer shall withhold such money.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IV, § 16, p. 350;

Laws 1885, c. 79, § 1, p. 323;

Laws 1889, c. 78, § 12, p. 547;

R.S.1913, § 6779;

C.S.1922, § 6320;

C.S.1929, § 79-417;

R.S.1943, § 79-419;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 90, p. 723;

Laws 1959, c. 391, § 1, p. 1346;

Laws 1969, c. 706, § 4, p. 2710;

Laws 1977, LB 487, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 874, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 230;

Laws 1985, LB 662, § 32;

Referendum 1986, No. 400;

Laws 1989, LB 487, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 35;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 40;

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 16;

Laws 1994, LB 858, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-451;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 281;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 59;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 27;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 73;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 394, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 52;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 20;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 28;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 36;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 7.
July 18, 2026
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.